California, session 20252026, AB18.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Secure Borders Act of 2025.SEC. 2. It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to combat illegal immigration and secure the border by repealing the sanctuary law (Senate Bill 54 of the 2017–2018 Regular Session (Chapter 495 of the Statutes of 2017)), prohibit the use of state funds for various welfare, health, housing, and other services for undocumented immigrants, require public disclosure of information on the impact of illegal immigration on crime rates and state and local services, provide cross-deputization training for local law enforcement to support federal border security actions, and provide standards for deployment of the State Guard to the border.